Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,111
Share of absent owner; how conserved.

The ascertained share of any absent owner shall be retained, or the proceeds invested for his benefit.

R.S.1867, Code § 844, p. 542;

R.S.1913, § 8327;

C.S.1922, § 9279;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,111;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,111.

Money paid to clerk of district court by referee in partition is received in official capacity and sureties are liable. Dirks v. Juel, 59 Neb. 353, 80 N.W. 1045 (1899).